Utah statutes.
16-16-407.   Amendment or restatement of articles of organization--Filing.
(1)  To amend its articles of organization, a limited cooperative association
shall deliver to the division for filing an amendment of the articles, or
restated articles of organization or articles of conversion or merger pursuant
to Part 16, Conversion and Merger, which contain one or more amendments of the
articles of organization, stating:
(a)  the name of the association;
(b)  the date of filing of the association's initial articles; and
(c)  the changes the amendment makes to the articles as most recently amended
or restated.
(2)  Before the beginning of the initial meeting of the board of directors, an
organizer who knows that information in the filed articles of organization was
inaccurate when the articles were filed or has become inaccurate due to
changed circumstances shall promptly:
(a)  cause the articles to be amended; or
(b)  if appropriate, deliver an amendment to the division for filing pursuant
to Section 16-16-203.
(3)  If restated articles of organization are adopted, the restated articles
may be delivered to the division for filing in the same manner as an
amendment.
(4)  Upon filing, an amendment of the articles of organization or other record
containing an amendment of the articles which has been properly adopted by the
members is effective as provided in Subsection 16-16-203(3).
